Kentucky statutes. TITLE XVI Motor Vehicles
Vehicle Equipment Safety Compact

189.760.
Vehicle safety compact adopted. [Repealed.]

189.763.
Declaration of need for and objectives of compact. [Repealed.]

189.767.
Governor as executive head of state. [Repealed.]

189.770.
Rules and regulations adopted under compact to supersede statutes. [Repealed.]

189.773.
Rules and regulations to be approved by legislature. [Repealed.]

189.777.
Commissioner of public safety to be vehicle equipment safety commissioner. [Repealed.]

189.780.
Agreements to place commission employes under retirement system. [Repealed.]

189.783.
State agencies to cooperate with vehicle equipment safety commission. [Repealed.]

189.787.
Document filed with secretary of state. [Repealed.]

189.790.
Budgets to department of finance — Inspection of accounts. [Repealed.]

189.793.
Penalties. [Repealed.]